Missouri, session 2026, HB2996.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 441, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 441.305, to read as follows:
441.305. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be referred to
as the "Missouri Housing Predictability and Transparency Act".
2. For any residential lease renewal issued on or after January 1, 2027, a
landlord shall not increase the rent charged to a tenant by more than seven percent plus
the annual change in the Consumer Price Index (CPI) for All Urban Consumers for the
United States as reported by the Bureau of Labor Statistics, or its successor index, or ten
percent, whichever is less, in any twelve-month period.
3. A landlord shall provide a tenant with written notice of any rent increase at
least ninety days prior to the effective date of the increase. Such notice shall include:
(1) The current rent amount;
(2) The proposed new rent amount;
(3) The percentage increase; and
(4) A statement of the tenant's right to request documentation supporting the
calculation.
4. The limitations of this section shall not apply to:
(1) Newly constructed residential units during the first fifteen years after
issuance of the certificate of occupancy;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2996 2
(2) Units that are newly created due to substantial rehabilitation where the
landlord has invested an amount equal to or greater than twenty-five percent of the
property's assessed value within the preceding twelve months;
(3) Units owned or operated by nonprofit housing providers receiving
government subsidies where rent calculations are set by federal or state programs; and
(4) Tenants who are delinquent on rent at the time of renewal, provided that
delinquency fees are in compliance with existing law.
5. A landlord shall not refuse to renew a lease, terminate a tenancy, or otherwise
retaliate against a tenant for asserting rights under this section.
6. (1) A tenant may bring a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction if a
landlord violates this section. If the court finds that a landlord has willfully imposed a
rent increase in excess of the allowed maximum, the tenant may be entitled to:
(a) Actual damages;
(b) Reasonable attorney's fees; and
(c) A civil penalty not to exceed three times the unlawful portion of the rent
increase.
(2) The attorney general may enforce this section and seek civil penalties for
pattern or practice violations.
7. The department of economic development may promulgate all necessary rules
and regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as
that term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in
this section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔